Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4417.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20911. If the department distributes an opioid antagonist, at no cost, to a person to assist the person in reducing the number of opioid-related overdoses in this state, the department shall also provide an opioid antagonist, upon request and at no cost, directly to a life support agency for the purpose of equipping a life support vehicle described in section 20919(1)(k) with an opioid antagonist.